Washington statutes.
RCW 15.130.110

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Advertisement" means all representations, other than by labeling, that directly or indirectly induce, or are likely to induce, the purchase of food.

(2) "Carrier" means a person who undertakes the professional conveyance of food.

(3) "Color additive" means the same as "color additive" in 21 U.S.C. Sec. 321.

(4) "Direct seller" means an entity that: (a) Receives prepackaged food from a food processor licensed or inspected, or both, by a state or federal regulatory agency or the department; (b) delivers the food directly to consumers who placed and paid for an order on the entity's website; (c) delivers food without opening the packaging and without dividing it into smaller packages; (d) provides no interim storage; and (e) delivers the food by means of vehicles equipped with either refrigeration or freezer units, or both. A direct seller is not a "carrier" under this chapter.

(5) "Food" means the same as "food" in 21 U.S.C. Sec. 321 and includes any article used for food or drink by humans or other animals.

(6) "Food additive" means the same as "food additive" in 21 U.S.C. Sec. 321.

(7) "Food facility" means any part of an operation, factory, establishment, or vehicle engaged in the sale, processing, storage, transport, or holding of food in intrastate commerce. A food facility includes, but is not limited to, grounds, premises, buildings, room, area, facilities, vehicles, appurtenances, and equipment.

(8) "Fish" means fresh or saltwater finfish and other forms of aquatic animal life intended for human consumption other than mollusks, birds, and mammals.

(9) "Intrastate commerce" means all commerce, including but not limited to the operation of any business or service establishment; and the manufacturing or processing of articles intended for sale, held for sale, sold, stored, transported, handled, or distributed in Washington state.

(10) "Label," "labeling" means the same as "label" and "labeling" in 21 U.S.C. Sec. 321.

(11) "Perishable packaged food" means all food intended for human consumption that is canned, bottled, or packaged at a time other than at the point of retail sale, has a risk of spoilage within thirty days, and is determined by the department in rule to be perishable. The term does not include raw agricultural commodities, alcoholic beverages, frozen foods, fresh meat, fresh poultry, fresh fish, and fresh shellfish.

(12) "Pesticide chemical" means any substance defined as a pesticide in chapter 15.58 RCW or recognized as a pesticide chemical under 21 U.S.C. Sec. 346.

(13) "Process," "processing" means manufacturing, processing, packing, canning, bottling, or any other production, preparation, or putting up.

(14) "Pull date" means the latest date a perishable packaged food may be offered for sale to the public.

(15) "Raw agricultural commodity" means the same as "raw agricultural commodity" in 21 U.S.C. Sec. 321.

(16) "Sale," "sell," "selling" means all parts of transactions concerning food including, but not limited to, advertising, offering, acceptance, dispensing, giving, delivering, serving, bartering, trading, or other supplying, holding for sale, and preparing for sale.

(17) "Shelf life" means the length of time a perishable packaged food retains its safe consumption quality if stored under proper temperature conditions.

(18) "Shellfish" means all crustaceans and mollusks intended for human consumption.

(19) "Storage" and "store" means holding, storing, or any other possessing.

[ 2018 c 236 s 102.]